Hawaii statutes.
§28-15 Tobacco enforcement special
fund. (a) There is established in the state treasury the tobacco
enforcement special fund, into which shall be deposited the tobacco settlement
moneys as provided by section 328L-2(a), the allocated portion of the stamp fee
designated to pay for the cost of enforcing the cigarette tax stamp as provided
by section 245-26, and fines as provided for by section 245-41.

(b) The tobacco enforcement special fund shall
be administered by the department of the attorney general and shall be used for
administering, operating, monitoring, and ensuring compliance with and
enforcement of:

(1) The Master Settlement Agreement as defined in
chapter 675 and any other statutes or programs relating to that agreement;

(2) Chapter 675;

(3) Tobacco prevention programs;

(4) The cigarette tax stamp as defined in chapter 245
and any other statutes or programs relating to that chapter;

(5) Chapter 245;

(6) Chapter 486P and any other statutes or programs
relating to that chapter; and

(7) Any other requirement deemed necessary to carry
out the purposes of the fund.

(c) All unencumbered and unexpended moneys in
excess of $500,000 remaining on balance in the tobacco enforcement special fund
at the close of June 30 of each year shall lapse to the credit of the state
general fund.

(d) The department of the attorney general
shall submit a report to the legislature, no later than twenty days prior to
the convening of each regular session, providing an accounting of the receipts
and expenditures of the fund. [L 2001, c 270, pt of §1; am L 2003, c 177, §1;
am L 2004, c 43, §19 and c 52, §19]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next